sk-SK: Štýl ladiacich kolíkov na gitare: V štýle bendža; Trecie (v štýle ukulele); Zamykacie; S otvoreným prevodom; Planetárne; Uzavretý prevod (tlakovo liate); Vintage delený kolík; Iné
pt-PT: Estilo das cravelhas da guitarra: Estilo banjo; Fricção (estilo ukulele); Com bloqueio; Mecanismo aberto; Planetário; Mecanismo selado (fundido); Pino fendido vintage; Outro
zh-CN: 吉他卷弦扭样式: 班卓琴式; 摩擦式（尤克里里式）; 锁定式; 开放式齿轮; 行星齿轮; 封闭式齿轮（压铸）; 复古开口柱; 其他
vi: Kiểu dáng chốt lên dây guitar: Kiểu Banjo; Ma sát (kiểu ukulele); Khóa; Bánh răng hở; Bánh răng hành tinh; Bánh răng kín (đúc); Trục xẻ cổ điển; Khác
th: รูปแบบลูกบิดปรับสายกีตาร์: สไตล์แบนโจ; ฟริกชัน (สไตล์อูคูเลเล่); แบบล็อก; เกียร์เปลือย; แพลนเนตทารี; เกียร์ซีล (ไดแคสต์); แกนผ่าสไตล์วินเทจ; อื่นๆ
pl: Styl klucza stroikowego gitary: Typu banjo; Cierne (typu ukulele); Blokowane; Z odkrytym mechanizmem; Planetarne; Zamknięte (odlewane); Tradycyjne z nacinanym kołkiem; Inne
ro-RO: Stil al cheilor de acordare pentru chitară: Stil banjo; Cu frecare (stil ukulele); Cu blocare; Angrenaj deschis; Planetar; Angrenaj sigilat (turnat); Vintage cu ax despicat; Altele
hu: Gitárkulcs stílusa: Bendzsó stílusú; Súrlódásos (ukulele stílusú); Zárható; Nyitott mechanikás; Bolygóműves; Zárt mechanikás (öntött); Vintage osztott tengelyes; Egyéb
nb: Stil for gitar-stemmepinne: Banjo-stil; Friksjon (ukulele-stil); Låsende; Åpen mekanikk; Planetarisk; Lukket mekanikk (støpt); Vintage delt stolpe; Annet
pt-BR: Tipo das tarraxas de guitarra: Estilo banjo; Fricção (estilo ukulele); Com trava; Engrenagem aberta; Planetária; Engrenagem blindada (die-cast); Pino fendido vintage; Outro
en: Guitar tuning peg style: Banjo-style; Friction (ukulele-style); Locking; Open gear; Planetary; Sealed gear (die-cast); Vintage split-post; Other
zh-TW: 吉他調音釘樣式: 班鳩琴風格; 摩擦式 (烏克麗麗風格); 鎖定式; 開放式齒輪; 行星齒輪; 密封式齒輪 (壓鑄); 復古分離式弦柱; 其他
ru: Стиль колков: В стиле банджо; Фрикционные (в стиле укулеле); Запирающиеся; Открытая механика; Планетарные; Закрытая механика (литые); Винтажные с разрезным штоком; Другое
bg-BG: Стил на ключовете за китара: Тип банджо; Фрикционни (тип укулеле); Заключващи; Отворена предавка; Планетарни; Капсулована предавка (изляти); Винтидж разделен щифт; Други
hr-HR: Stil mehanike gitarskih ključeva: Banjo stil; Frikcijske (ukulele stil); Sa zaključavanjem; Otvoreni zupčanik; Planetarne; Zatvoreni zupčanik (lijevane); Vintage razdvojena osovina; Ostalo
ko: 기타 조율용 페그 스타일: 밴조 스타일; 프릭션(우쿨렐레 스타일); 락킹; 오픈 기어; 플래니터리; 실드 기어(다이캐스트); 빈티지 스플릿 포스트; 기타
it: Stile della meccanica della chitarra: Stile banjo; A frizione (stile ukulele); Bloccante; Meccanismo aperto; Planetario; Meccanismo sigillato (pressofuso); Vintage con perno diviso; Altro
fr: Type de chevilles d'accordage de guitare: Style banjo; Friction (style ukulélé); À blocage; Engrenage ouvert; Planétaire; Engrenage scellé (moulé sous pression); Tige fendue vintage; Autre
es: Estilo de las clavijas de la guitarra: Estilo banjo; Fricción (estilo ukelele); Bloqueo; Engranaje abierto; Planetario; Engranaje sellado (fundido a presión); Poste dividido vintage; Otro
da: Stemmeskruestil for guitar: Banjo-stil; Friktion (ukulele-stil); Låsende; Åben mekanik; Planetarisk; Lukket mekanik (trykstøbt); Vintage delt stift; Andet
el: Τύπος κλειδιών κουρδίσματος κιθάρας: Τύπου Banjo; Τριβής (τύπου γιουκαλίλι); Με κλείδωμα; Ανοιχτού μηχανισμού; Πλανητικού μηχανισμού; Κλειστού μηχανισμού (χυτοπρεσαριστό); Vintage split-post; Άλλο
ja: ギターチューニングペグスタイル: バンジョースタイル; フリクション (ウクレレスタイル); ロッキング; オープンギア; プラネタリー; 密閉型ギア (ダイキャスト); ビンテージスプリットポスト; その他
tr: Gitar burgusu stili: Banjo stili; Sürtünmeli (ukulele stili); Kilitlemeli; Açık dişli; Planet dişli; Kapalı dişli (döküm); Vintage yarık pimli; Diğer
sl-SI: Stil količev za uglaševanje za kitaro: V slogu banja; Frikcijski (v slogu ukulela); Z zaklepanjem; Odprti mehanizem; Planetarni mehanizem; Zaprt mehanizem (tlačno lit); Klasični z razcepljenim zatičem (Vintage split-post); Drugo
fi: Kitaran viritysnupin tyyli: Banjotyyli; Kitka (ukuleletyyli); Lukkiutuva; Avoin koneisto; Planeetta; Suljettu koneisto (painevalettu); Vintage halkaistu tappi; Muu
de: Stil der Gitarrenstimmwirbel: Banjo-Style; Friction (Ukulele-Style); Locking; Offene Mechanik; Planetary; Versiegelte Mechanik (Druckguss); Vintage Split-Post; Sonstige
lt-LT: Gitaros derinimo kaiščio tipas: Bandžos stiliaus; Frikciniai (ukulelės stiliaus); Fiksuojami; Atviro mechanizmo; Planetariniai; Sandaraus mechanizmo (lieti); Vintažiniai su perskeltu velenėliu; Kita
cs: Typ ladicího kolíčku na kytaru: Banjo styl; Třecí (ukulele styl); Zamykací; Otevřená mechanika; Planetová; Uzavřená mechanika (litá); Vintage s dělenou hřídelí; Jiné
nl: Stijl gitaarstemmechaniek: Banjo-stijl; Wrijving (ukelele-stijl); Locking; Open gear; Planetary; Gesloten gear (gegoten); Vintage split-post; Overig
sv: Stämskruvsmodell (gitarr): Banjostil; Friktion (ukulelestil); Låsande; Öppen mekanik; Planetväxel; Kapslad mekanik (pressgjuten); Vintage delad stolpe; Övrigt